Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,109
Local housing agency; dissolution; transfer of rights, property, and liability.

Within a reasonable time subsequent to approval by all necessary parties of a local housing agency's resolution to dissolve, the agency shall transfer its assets and liabilities to the transferee designated in the resolution. Upon the transfer of any of the agency's property, the receiving local housing agency, city, county, or other public agency shall have all right, title, and interest in and to such property and all duties and obligations arising out of the transfer of such property as the transferring agency had. Upon dissolution and transfer, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such transferring agency shall be in the name of, and vest in, such receiving local housing agency, city, county, or other public agency and all obligations of such transferring local housing agency shall be the obligations of such receiving local housing agency, city, county, or other public agency. All rights and remedies of any person against such transferring local housing agency may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such receiving local housing agency, city, county, or other public agency to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such transferring local housing agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 38.